Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 279C.815 is amended to read:
279C.815. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Electrical worker” means an  electrician, inside wireman, cable splicer, electrical
welder, electrical material handler, lighting maintenance worker  or limited energy
electrician.
(b) “Person” means  an employer, a labor organization or an official representative of an em-
ployee or employer association.
(2)(a) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries at least  once each year shall
determine in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection the prevailing rate of  wage for
workers in each trade or occupation in each locality described in ORS 279C.800 and shall make this
information available at least twice each year. The commissioner may amend the rate at any time.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the prevailing rate of wage
for a trade  or occupation in a locality is the rate of wage set forth in the collective bargaining
agreement for the trade or  occupation in the locality or, if more than one collective bargaining
agreement covers a trade or occupation in the locality, the  highest rate of wage among the collec-
tive bargaining agreements for the trade or occupation in the locality.
(B) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.800 (3), for  the purpose of specifying a prevailing rate of
wage for electrical  workers in accordance with subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the ap-
plicable locality is the geographical area within which each local union is the exclusive rep-
resentative for  the local union’s membership, and the applicable collective bargaining
agreement is the collective bargaining agreement to which the local union is a party.
(c) If a collective bargaining agreement does not  exist for a trade or occupation in a locality,
the commissioner shall determine the prevailing rate of wage by conducting an independent wage
survey in the locality. The commissioner may  also consider additional information such as other
independent wage surveys and the prevailing rates of wage determined by appropriate  federal
agencies or agencies of adjoining states. If a wage survey under this paragraph does not show  that
a majority in  the same trade or occupation is paid at the same rate, the average rate of hourly
wage, including all fringe benefits, paid  in the locality to workers in the same trade or occupation
is the prevailing rate. If the wage a contractor or  subcontractor pays to workers on a public works
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-INTRO) Page 1
is based on a  period of time other than an hour, the hourly wage must be mathematically determined
by the number of hours worked in that period of time.
(3) A person shall make reports  and returns to the Bureau of Labor and Industries that the
commissioner requires to determine  the prevailing rates of wage, using forms the bureau provides
and within the time the commissioner prescribes. The person  or an authorized representative of the
person shall certify to the accuracy of the reports and returns.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS  192.311 to 192.478, reports and returns or other information provided
to the  commissioner under this section are confidential and not available for inspection by the
public.
(5) The commissioner may enter into a contract with a public or private party to  obtain data
and information the commissioner needs to determine the prevailing rate of wage. The contract  may
provide for the  manner and extent of the review of affected trades and occupations and for other
requirements regarding  timelines of reports, accuracy of data and information and supervision and
review as the commissioner prescribes.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 279C.815  by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to de-
terminations of the prevailing rate of wage that the Commissioner of the Bureau of  Labor
and Industries makes on and after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-INTRO) Page 2